Wyoming statutes. Title 26 Insurance Code
Article 4. Group Or Master Policy Property And Casualty Insurance Act

Effective dates. —

Laws 2013, ch. 123, § 4, makes the act effective July 1, 2013.

§ 26-23-401.
Qualifications for group or master personal and commercial lines property and casualty insurance policies.

Personal and commercial lines property and casualty insurance may be offered to a resident of this state under a group or master policy issued or delivered pursuant to this section.

Group or master property and casualty personal lines policies shall be subject to the following requirements:

The group or master personal lines property and casualty policy shall not be issued or delivered in this state unless the commissioner finds that:

The issuance of the group or master policy is not contrary to the best interest of the public;

The issuance of the group or master policy would result in economies of acquisition or administration; and

The benefits are reasonable in relation to the premiums charged.

A group or master personal lines property and casualty insurance coverage shall not be offered in this state by an insurer under a policy issued or delivered in another state unless this state has made a determination that the requirements of subparagraph (b)(i)(C) have been met;

The premium for the group or master personal lines property and casualty policy shall be paid either from the policyholder’s funds or from funds contributed by the covered persons, or from both.

History.

2013 ch. 123, § 1, effective July 1, 2013.

§ 26-23-402.
Group or master policy.

A group or master policy for personal or commercial lines property and casualty insurance coverage shall be issued to the policyholder. Eligible members or covered persons insured under a group or master policy shall be provided evidence of coverage setting forth a statement as to the insurance protection to which they are entitled.

A group or master policy for personal or commercial lines property and casualty insurance coverage shall not be issued or delivered in this state unless the policy form, together with all forms for riders, certificates and endorsements to the policy form, meet the applicable filing requirements in this state. Subsequent amendments to the policy form or forms for riders, certificates and endorsements to the policy form shall not be issued or delivered until they meet the applicable filing requirements in this state.

The group or master personal or commercial lines property and casualty policy shall set forth the coverages, exclusions and conditions of the insurance provided therein, together with the terms and conditions of the agreement between the policyholder and the insurer. The policy shall make express provisions for the following:

Methods of premium collection;

Enrollment period, effective date provisions and eligibility standards for members or covered persons;

Termination or modification of the policy; and

Conversion privileges of the members or covered persons, if any.

If the group or master personal or commercial lines property or casualty master policy provides for remittance of premium by the policyholder, failure of the policyholder to remit premiums when due shall not be regarded as nonpayment of premium by the member or covered person who has made his contribution on a timely basis.

History.

2013 ch. 123, § 1, effective July 1, 2013.

§ 26-23-403.
Policy coverage.

Coverage under a group or master personal or commercial lines property and casualty insurance policy may be terminated as to a member or covered person only for:

Failure of the member or covered person to make required premium contributions;

Termination of the master policy in its entirety or as to the class to which the member or covered person belongs;

Discontinuance of the member’s or covered person’s membership in a class eligible for coverage;

Termination of membership or covered person’s services; or

Material misrepresentation of a fact in obtaining coverage which if known to the master policyholder would have caused the master policyholder not to offer coverage to the member or covered person;

Fraud or material misrepresentation in the presentation of a claim;

Exhausting the aggregate limit of liability, if any, under the terms of the policy.

Termination of coverage under subsection (a) of this section shall be effective as follows:

Upon written notice made as described in W.S.

26-35-101

, or electronic notice if made in connection with portable electronic device insurance, sent not less than ten (10) days prior to the proposed effective date of cancellation if cancellation is for the reason stated in paragraph (a)(i) of this section;

Immediately if cancellation is for the reasons stated in paragraph (a)(iii), (iv), (v) or (vi) of this section;

Immediately if cancellation is for the reason stated in paragraph (a)(vii) of this section. However, the insurer shall send notice of cancellation to the covered person within thirty (30) calendar days after exhaustion of the limit and if notice is not timely sent, coverage shall continue notwithstanding the aggregate limit of liability until the insurer sends notice of termination to the covered person; or

Upon written notice made as described in W.S.

26-35-101

, or electronic notice if made in connection with portable electronic device insurance, sent not less than thirty (30) days prior to the proposed effective date of cancellation if cancellation is for the reason stated in paragraph (a)(ii) of this section.

Coverage under a continuous group or master personal or commercial line property and casualty insurance policy may be modified in accordance with the following:

The insurer shall provide the group or master policyholder and covered persons with at least thirty (30) days prior written notice of the change in coverage; and

The insurer shall provide the group or master policyholder with a revised policy or endorsement and each covered person with a revised certificate, endorsement, updated brochure or other evidence indicating a change in the terms and conditions has occurred and a summary of material changes.

For purposes of this section:

“Portable electronic device insurance” means as defined in W.S. 26-9-202(a)(xi);

For portable electronic device insurance electronic notice under the Uniform Electronic Transaction Act, W.S.

40-21-101

through

40-21-119

, may be used if the parties have agreed to conduct transactions by electronic means according to W.S.

40-21-105

.

History.

2013 ch. 123, § 1, § 1, effective July 1, 2013; 2019 ch. 144, § 1, effective July 1, 2019.

The 2019 amendment,

effective July 1, 2019, in (b)(i) and (b)(iv), added "or electronic notice if made in connection with portable electronic device insurance"; and added (d).

§ 26-23-404.
Duties and limitations of insurers.

No insurer shall issue or deliver a group or master personal lines property and casualty insurance policy if it is a condition of membership in a group that any member purchase insurance pursuant to the policy, or if any member shall be subject to any penalty by reason of his nonparticipation.

No insurer shall issue or deliver a group personal lines property and casualty insurance policy if:

The purchase of insurance available under the policy is contingent upon the purchase of any other insurance; or

The purchase or price of any other insurance, product or service is contingent upon the purchase of insurance available under the group personal lines property and casualty insurance policy.

History.

2013 ch. 123, § 1, effective July 1, 2013.

§ 26-23-405.
Regulatory jurisdiction.

No master policy or certificate of insurance for group property and casualty insurance coverage shall be issued or delivered in this state unless issued or delivered by an insurer which is duly licensed in this state to write the lines of insurance covered by the master policy.

This article shall not apply to the mass marketing or any other type of marketing of individual property and casualty insurance policies.

This article shall not apply to policies of credit property or credit casualty insurance which insure the debtors of a creditor or creditors with respect to their indebtedness or to policies of lender placed insurance programs.

Nothing in this article shall limit the authority of the insurance commissioner with respect to complaints or disputes involving residents of this state arising out of a master policy that has been issued or delivered in another state.

The insurance commissioner is authorized to promulgate rules and regulations as may be necessary to carry out the provisions of this article.

History.

2013 ch. 123, § 1, effective July 1, 2013.

§ 26-23-406.
Effective date.

This article shall take effect July 1, 2013. No master policy or certificate of insurance for group property and casualty insurance coverage shall be issued or delivered in this state after the effective date unless issued or delivered in compliance with this article. A master policy or certificate that is lawfully in effect on July 1, 2013 shall comply with the provisions of this article within twenty-four (24) months of the effective date.

History.

2013 ch. 123, § 1, effective July 1, 2013.